lexd/lez_verb.lexd
PATTERN Verb
(MasdarStem [<verb>:] [>] MasdarDerived)[^[Strong,Weak]]( ([>] Plural) | ([>] (Erg | ErgPl) [<erg>:]))?
(ImperfStem [<verb>:] [>] (Infinitive | Hortative | Imperfective | Future | Prohibitive))[^[Strong,Weak]]
(ImperfStem [<verb>:] [>] ImperfConverb)[^[Strong,Weak]]
(ImperfStem [<verb>:] [>] (Imperfective | Future) [>] Past)[^[Strong,Weak]]
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] (Aorist | Perfect) [>] Past)[^[Strong,Weak]]
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] AoristConverb)[^[Strong,Weak]]
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] Aorist)[^[Strong,Weak]] 
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] Perfect)[^[Strong,Weak]] 
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] Perfect [>] SecondaryImperfectiveConverb)[^[Strong,Weak]]
(MasdarStem [<verb>:] [>] MasdarDerived)[^[Strong,Weak]] Erg [>] (MasdarInfl | (MasdarInflEssive ( [<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative)))))
(MasdarStem [<verb>:] [>] MasdarDerived)[^[Strong,Weak]] [>] ErgPl [>] (MasdarInfl | (MasdarInflEssive ( [<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative)))))
(MasdarStem [<verb>:] [>] MasdarDerived)[^[Strong,Weak]] Erg [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative))
(MasdarStem [<verb>:] [>] MasdarDerived)[^[Strong,Weak]] [>] ErgPl [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative))
(MasdarStem [<verb>:] [>] Optative)[^[Strong,Weak]]
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] (Aorist | Perfect))[^[Strong,Weak]] [>] Negative ([>] InterrogativeMood)?
((ImperfStem | VerbException) [<verb>:] [>] (Imperfective | Future))[^[Strong,Weak]] [>] Negative ([>] InterrogativeMood)?
Imperative [<verb>:] [<imper>:] 
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] (AoristParticiple | PerfParticiple))[^[Strong,Weak],^[Polysyllabic,Monosyllabic,Exception,NoException]] # атрибутивная форма
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] (AoristParticiple | PerfParticiple) [>] AdjNumber [<abs>:])[^[Strong,Weak],^[Polysyllabic,Monosyllabic,Exception,NoException]] # субстантивированная
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] (AoristParticiple | PerfParticiple) [>] AdjObl [<erg>:])[^[Strong,Weak],^[Polysyllabic,Monosyllabic,Exception,NoException]] # субстантивированная
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] (AoristParticiple | PerfParticiple) [>] AdjObl [>](Case | (InflEssive ([>] (Elative | Directive))?)))[^[Strong,Weak],^[Polysyllabic,Monosyllabic,Exception,NoException]] # субстантивированная
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] AoristParticiple [>] TempConverb)[^[Strong,Weak],^[Polysyllabic,Monosyllabic,Exception,NoException]]
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] PerfParticiple [>] TempConverb)[^[Strong,Weak]]
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] ArchaicPreterit)[^[Strong,Weak],^[Polysyllabic,Monosyllabic,Exception,NoException]]
(ImperfStem [<verb>:] [>] ImperfParticiple [>] TempConverb)[^[Strong,Weak]]
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] AoristParticiple [>] ImmediateAnteriorConverb)[^[Strong,Weak],^[Polysyllabic,Monosyllabic,Exception,NoException]]
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] AoristParticiple [>] ConditionalMood)[^[Strong,Weak],^[Polysyllabic,Monosyllabic,Exception,NoException]] ([>] Add)?
(ImperfStem [<verb>:] [>] (Imperfective | Future) [>] ConditionalMood)[^[Strong,Weak]] ([>] Add)?
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] (Aorist | Perfect) [>] ConditionalMood)[^[Strong,Weak]] ([>] Add)?
(ImperfStem [<verb>:] [>] (Imperfective | Future) [>] InterrogativeMood)[^[Strong,Weak]]
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] (Aorist | Perfect) [>] InterrogativeMood)[^[Strong,Weak]]
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] AoristParticiple [>] (MannerConverb | CasualConverb))[^[Strong,Weak],^[Polysyllabic,Monosyllabic,Exception,NoException]]
(ImperfStem [<verb>:] [>] ImperfParticiple [>] (MannerConverb | CasualConverb))[^[Strong,Weak]]
(AoristStem [<verb>:] [>] PerfParticiple [>] (MannerConverb | CasualConverb))[^[Strong,Weak]]
(ImperfStem [<verb>:] [>] ImperfParticiple)[^[Strong,Weak]] # атрибутивная форма
(ImperfStem [<verb>:] [>] ImperfParticiple [>] AdjNumber [<abs>:])[^[Strong,Weak]]
(ImperfStem [<verb>:] [>] ImperfParticiple [>] AdjObl [<erg>:])[^[Strong,Weak]]
(ImperfStem [<verb>:] [>] ImperfParticiple [>] AdjObl [>] (Case | (InflEssive ([>] (Elative | Directive))?)))[^[Strong,Weak]]
VerbException [<verb>:] ([>] (Infinitive | Imperfective | Future))?
ImperfStem [<verb>:] [>] ArchaicFuture
ImperfStem [<verb>:] [>] ArchaicImperfPart
(MasdarStem [<verb>:] Periphrasis)[^[Strong,Weak]]

PATTERN DoVerbPattern
(DoVerb(1) [<verb>:] [>] (Imperfective | Future) ([>] ConditionalMood)?)[^[Strong,Weak]] ([>] Negative)? ([>] InterrogativeMood)?
(DoVerb(1) [<verb>:] [>] (ImperfConverb | Prohibitive))[^[Strong,Weak]]
(NegativePrefix [>])? (DoVerb(1) [<verb>:] [>] (Infinitive | Hortative))[^[Strong]] 
(NegativePrefix [>])? (DoVerb(1) [<verb>:] [>] ImperfParticiple ([>] (MannerConverb | CasualConverb))?)[^[Strong]] 
(DoVerb(2) [<verb>:] [>] Infinitive)[^[Strong,Weak]]
(NegativePrefix [>])? (DoVerb(3) [<verb>:] [>] (Optative | AoristConverb))[^[Strong,Weak]]
(NegativePrefix [>])? (DoVerb(3) [<verb>:] [>] MasdarDerived)[^[Strong,Weak]] (([>] Plural) | ([>] (Erg | ErgPl) [<erg>:]))?
(NegativePrefix [>])? (DoVerb(3) [<verb>:] [>] MasdarDerived)[^[Strong,Weak]] Erg [>] (MasdarInfl | (MasdarInflEssive ( [<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative)))))
(NegativePrefix [>])? (DoVerb(3) [<verb>:] [>] MasdarDerived)[^[Strong,Weak]] [>] ErgPl [>] (MasdarInfl | (MasdarInflEssive ( [<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative)))))
(NegativePrefix [>])? (DoVerb(3) [<verb>:] [>] MasdarDerived)[^[Strong,Weak]] Erg [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative))
(NegativePrefix [>])? (DoVerb(3) [<verb>:] [>] MasdarDerived)[^[Strong,Weak]] [>] ErgPl [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative))
(DoVerb(3) [<verb>:] [>] Aorist ([>] (InterrogativeMood | ConditionalMood))?)[^[Strong,Weak]] ([>] Negative)?
(DoVerb(3) [<verb>:] [>] Perfect ([>] (SecondaryImperfectiveConverb | ConditionalMood | InterrogativeMood))?)[^[Strong,Weak]] ([>] Negative)?
(NegativePrefix [>])? (DoVerb(3) [<verb>:] [>] (AoristParticiple | PerfParticiple) ([>] (TempConverb | MannerConverb | CasualConverb))?)[^[Strong,Weak],^[Polysyllabic,Monosyllabic,Exception]]
(NegativePrefix [>])? (DoVerb(3) [<verb>:] [>] AoristParticiple [>] (ImmediateAnteriorConverb | ConditionalMood))[^[Strong,Weak],^[Polysyllabic,Monosyllabic,Exception]]
(DoVerb(3) [<verb>:] [>] ArchaicPreterit)[^[Strong,Weak],^[Polysyllabic,Monosyllabic,Exception,NoException]]
(NegativePrefix [>])? DoVerb(1) [<verb>:] [>] ArchaicImperfPart

LEXICON Plural
<pl>:ар

LEXICON Erg
:и

LEXICON ErgPl
<pl>:ри

LEXICON MasdarInfl
<gen>:н
<dat>:з

LEXICON MasdarInflEssive
<ad>:в
<post>:хъ
<sub>:к
<super>:а>л

LEXICON MasdarDerived
<msd>:н[Strong]
<msd>:ун[Weak]

LEXICON Optative
<opt>:рай
<opt>:й[Strong]
<opt>:уй[Weak]

LEXICON Infinitive # imperfective converb
<inf>:з[Strong]
<inf>:из[Weak]

LEXICON Imperfective
<imperf>:зва[Strong]
<imperf>:зава[Weak]
<imperf.cont>:зма[Strong]
<imperf.cont>:зама[Weak]

LEXICON ImperfConverb
<postr>:далди
<grad>:рдавай[Strong]
<grad>:ирдавай[Weak]
<immant>:замаз[Weak]
<immant>:змаз[Strong]

LEXICON Hortative
<hort>:н[Strong]
<hort>:ин[Weak]

LEXICON Future
<fut>:да # будущее

LEXICON Prohibitive
<prohib>:мир

LEXICON Aorist
<aor>:на # прошедшее определенное

LEXICON Periphrasis
<per>:н[Strong]
<per>:[Weak]

LEXICON Perfect
<prf>:нва[Strong]
<prf>:нава[Weak]
<prf.cont>:нма[Strong]
<prf.cont>:нама[Weak]

LEXICON AoristConverb
<aoc>:на
<immant>:нмаз[Strong]
<immant>:нмазди[Strong]
<immant>:намаз[Weak]
<immant>:намазди[Weak]

LEXICON TempConverb
<temp>:ла

LEXICON Negative
<neg>:ч

LEXICON NegativePrefix
<neg>:т

LEXICON AoristParticiple
<aor><ptp>:ай[Weak,NoException]
<aor><ptp>:р[Strong,Exception]
<aor><ptp>:й[Strong,Polysyllabic]
<aor><ptp>:йи[Strong,Monosyllabic]

LEXICON ImperfParticiple
<imperf>><ptp>:зва>й[Strong]
<imperf>><ptp>:зава>й[Weak]
<fut>><ptp>:да>й
<imperf.cont>><ptp>:зма>й[Strong]
<imperf.cont>:зама>й[Weak]

LEXICON PerfParticiple
<prf>><ptp>:нва>й[Strong]
<prf>><ptp>:нава>й[Weak]

LEXICON ArchaicPreterit
<apret>:ра[Strong,Exception]
<apret>:я[Strong,Monosyllabic]
<apret>:я[Strong,Polysyllabic]
<apret>:ая[Weak,NoException]
<apret><neg>:нч

LEXICON ArchaicFuture
<afut>:ди
<afut>><pst>:д>ир
<afut><pst><neg>:чир

LEXICON ArchaicImperfPart
<aimpp>:р
<aimpp>:ри

LEXICON Past
<pst>:й
<neg>><pst>:ч>ир

LEXICON ImmediateAnteriorConverb
<immant>:валди

LEXICON ConditionalMood
<cnd>:тӀа

LEXICON InterrogativeMood
<inter>:ни

LEXICON SecondaryImperfectiveConverb
<imc>:з

LEXICON MannerConverb
<man>:вал

LEXICON CasualConverb
<caus>:виляй

LEXICON DoVerb(3) # поступать, делать, работать
ийи[Strong] и[Strong] аву[Strong,Exception]

LEXICON VerbException
кӀан[Weak]
кичӀе[Strong]
чи[Strong]
тӀа[Strong]
